Utah statutes.
78B-13-109.   Appearance and limited immunity.
(1)  A party to a child custody proceeding who is not subject to personal
jurisdiction in this state and is a responding party under Part 2,
Jurisdiction, a party in a proceeding to modify a child custody determination
under Part 2, Jurisdiction, or a petitioner in a proceeding to enforce or
register a child custody determination under Part 3, Enforcement, may appear
and participate in the proceeding without submitting to personal jurisdiction
over the party for another proceeding or purpose.
(2)  A party is not subject to personal jurisdiction in this state solely by
being physically present for the purpose of participating in a proceeding
under this chapter.  If a party is subject to personal jurisdiction in this
state on a basis other than physical presence, the party may be served with
process in this state.  If a party present in this state is subject to the
jurisdiction of another state, service of process allowable under the laws of
that state may be accomplished in this state.
(3)  The immunity granted by this section does not extend to civil litigation
based on acts unrelated to the participation in a proceeding under this
chapter committed by an individual while present in this state.
